California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) Any increases to maximum aid payment levels after July 1, 2018, are contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 25.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.023.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, effective October 1, 2019, the maximum aid payments pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in effect on April 1, 2019, shall be set forth as follows:REGION 1Assistance Unit SizeMaximum Aid
 Payment-ExemptMaximum Aid
 Payment-Nonexempt1$606$5502$778$6963$983$8784$1,181$1,0605$1,385$1,2426$1,589$1,4247$1,792$1,6068$1,998$1,7889$2,199$1,97010 or more$2,406$2,152REGION 2Assistance Unit SizeMaximum Aid
 Payment-ExemptMaximum Aid
 Payment-Nonexempt1$576$5202$739$6613$934$8344$1,122$1,0075$1,316$1,1806$1,510$1,3537$1,702$1,5268$1,898$1,6999$2,089$1,87210 or more$2,286$2,044(b) For purposes of this section, “Region 1” and “Region 2” have the same meanings as defined in Section 11452.018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 58.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.025.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, effective on March 1, 2014, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2012, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 11450.02, shall be increased by 5 percent.

(2) Effective April 1, 2015, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2014, as specified in paragraph (1), shall be increased by 5 percent.

(3) Effective October 1, 2016, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2016, as specified in paragraph (2), shall be increased by 1.43 percent.

(4) (A) Effective January 1, 2017, households eligible for aid under this chapter shall
 receive an increased aid payment consistent with the repeal of former Section 11450.04, as it read on January 1, 2016, known as the “maximum family grant rule.”

(B) In recognition of the increased cost of aid payments resulting from that repeal, moneys deposited into the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount shall be allocated to counties pursuant to Section 17601.50 as follows:

(i) One hundred seven million forty-seven thousand dollars ($107,047,000) for January 1, 2017, to June 30, 2017, inclusive.

(ii) Two hundred twenty-three million four hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($223,454,000) for the 2017–18 fiscal year and for every fiscal year thereafter.

(5) Effective October 1, 2021, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1,
 2021, as specified in paragraph (3), shall be increased by 5.3 percent.

(6) Effective October 1, 2022, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2022, as specified in paragraph (5), shall be increased by 11 percent.

(7) Effective October 1, 2023, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2023, as specified in paragraph (6), shall be increased by 3.6 percent.

(8) Effective October 1, 2024, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2024, as specified in paragraph (7), shall be increased by 0.3 percent.

(9) Effective October 1, 2026, the maximum aid payments in effect on July 1, 2026, as specified in paragraph (8), shall be increased by 1.8 percent.

(b) Commencing in 2014 and annually thereafter, on or before January 10 and on or before May 14, the Director of Finance shall do all of the following:

(1) Estimate the amount of growth revenues pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 17606.10 that will be deposited in the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund for the current fiscal year and the following fiscal year and the amounts in the subaccount carried over from prior fiscal years.

(2) For the current fiscal year and the following fiscal year, determine the total cost of providing the increases described in subdivision (a), as well as any other increase in the maximum aid payments subsequently provided only under this section, after adjusting for updated projections of CalWORKs costs associated with caseload changes, as
 reflected in the local assistance subvention estimates prepared by the State Department of Social Services and released with the annual Governor’s Budget and subsequent May Revision update.

(3) If the amount estimated in paragraph (1) plus the amount projected to be deposited for the current fiscal year into the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount pursuant to subparagraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17600.15 is greater than the amount determined in paragraph (2), the difference shall be used to calculate the percentage increase to the CalWORKs maximum aid payment standards that could be fully funded on an ongoing basis beginning the following fiscal year.

(4) If the amount estimated in paragraph (1) plus the amount projected to be deposited for the current fiscal year into the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount pursuant to
 subparagraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17600.15 is equal to or less than the amount determined in paragraph (2), no additional increase to the CalWORKs maximum aid payment standards shall be provided in the following fiscal year in accordance with this section.

(5) (A) Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year and for all fiscal years thereafter, if changes to the estimated amounts determined in paragraphs (1) or (2), or both, as of the May Revision, are enacted as part of the final budget, the Director of Finance shall repeat, using the same methodology used in the May Revision, the calculations described in paragraphs (3) and (4) using the revenue projections and grant costs assumed in the enacted budget.

(B) If a calculation is required pursuant to subparagraph (A), the Department of Finance shall report the result of this calculation to the
 appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature upon enactment of the Budget Act.

(c) An increase in maximum aid payments calculated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), or pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) if applicable, shall become effective on October 1 of the following fiscal year.

(d) (1) An increase in maximum aid payments provided in accordance with this section shall be funded with growth revenues from the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17600.15 and subdivision (f) of Section 17606.10, to the extent funds are available in that subaccount.

(2) If funds received by the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount in a particular fiscal year are insufficient
 to fully fund any increases to maximum aid payments made pursuant to this section, the remaining cost for that fiscal year will be addressed through existing provisional authority included in the annual Budget Act. Additional increases to the maximum aid payments shall not be provided until and unless the ongoing cumulative costs of all prior increases provided pursuant to this section are fully funded by the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 15200, counties shall not be required to contribute a share of the costs to cover the increases to maximum aid payments made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 18.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.026.

(a) Commencing in the 2019–20 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, if an incremental adjustment is made to the maximum aid payments pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, the counties’ share of that adjustment, as required pursuant to Section 15200, shall be based upon the total incremental adjustment or the increase in the California Necessities Index pursuant to Section 11453 for the fiscal year in which the adjustment becomes effective, whichever is lower.

(b) If more than one incremental adjustment is made to maximum aid payments pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450 during a single fiscal year, the counties’ share of those combined adjustments, as required pursuant to Section
 15200, shall be based upon the total combined incremental adjustments or the increase in the California Necessities Index pursuant to Section 11453 for the fiscal year in which the adjustments become effective, whichever is lower.

(c) This section shall not apply to any incremental increases or decreases made to the maximum aid payments prior to July 1, 2019.

(d) This section shall not apply to any incremental increases or decreases made to maximum aid payments pursuant to Section 11450.025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 26.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.027.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, maximum aid payments in the CalWORKs program are sufficient to ensure that no child lives in deep poverty. As stated in Section 11450.022, it is the intent of the Legislature to increase CalWORKs maximum aid payments until the maximum aid payment levels reach 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the family size that is one greater than the assistance unit, accounting for families with an unaided family member and when children in these families receive a proportionally reduced grant. It is further the intent of the Legislature that, upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, maximum aid payments increase in accordance with the growth of the federal poverty level to continue to ensure that no child lives in deep
 poverty. For purposes of this subdivision, “deep poverty” means at or below 50 percent of the federal poverty level.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, effective October 1, 2022, the maximum aid payments described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, in effect on July 1, 2022, as specified in Section 11450.025, shall be increased by 10 percent in addition to the 11-percent increase specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450.025.

(c) Commencing on January 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, on or before January 10, the State Department of Social Services shall provide a display in writing to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, and on the department’s internet website, showing the CalWORKs maximum aid payment amounts compared to the federal poverty level for the family size that is one greater than the assistance unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 21.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.03.

(a) Notwithstanding the maximum aid payments specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, families that have resided in this state for less than 12 months shall be paid an amount calculated in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450, not to exceed the maximum aid payment that would have been received by that family from the state of prior residence.

(b) This section shall not become operative until the date of approval by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of this section so as to ensure the continued compliance of the state plan for the following:

(1) Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 601) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(2) Title IX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 37.5.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.05.

(a) For purposes of determining the maximum aid payment specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11450, the number of needy persons in the same family shall not be decreased because of the death of a child in the assistance unit for the month in which the death occurred or the following month.

(b) Aid paid under subdivision (a) shall not be deemed an overpayment unless the county determines, pursuant to Sections 11004 and 11004.1, that the assistance unit would have been subject to overpayment recovery, and the county would have sought recovery, even if the child had not died.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (AB 433)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.3.

(a) The director may establish, within the department, the Emergency Housing Apartment Program Demonstration Project.

(b) The director may, by formal order, waive the operation of specific provisions in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450, as required for participation in the Emergency Housing Apartment Program Demonstration Project. The order establishing the waiver shall limit the operation of the demonstration project to San Francisco or Contra Costa County,
 or both, for no more than five years of operation, and shall not result in the reduction or elimination of any family’s eligibility for assistance under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450. The order establishing the waiver shall not take effect unless and until the following conditions have been met:

(1) The United States Department of Health and Human Services has approved federal financial participation for the demonstration project.

(2) A comprehensive plan, including an analysis of the expected costs and savings, has been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties conducting the demonstration project and filed with the policy and fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature.

(c) The county or counties participating in the demonstration project authorized by this
 section shall submit an annual report to the department on the demonstration project. The county or counties shall additionally collect and report any data and findings as required by the department and shall cooperate with the department in evaluating the demonstration project.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for the demonstration project authorized by this section be contained in annual Budget Act appropriations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 244.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.4.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an emergency assistance for needy families program to serve the shelter needs of homeless families apparently eligible for aid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450. To this end, the State Department of Social Services shall conduct negotiations with the United States Department of Health and Human Services on establishing an emergency assistance program to address the temporary and permanent shelter needs of homeless families currently served under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f)
 of Section 11450.

(b) (1) Upon receiving federal approval for an emergency assistance program and prior to implementation, the department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to implement the emergency assistance program. The notification shall identify those portions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450 which are intended to be superseded by the emergency assistance program.

(2) Except as provided in this subdivision, the emergency assistance program for which notification is submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall become effective the first day after 120 calendar days of continuous session of the Legislature after the date on which the notification is transmitted, or at a later date as may be indicated in the notification, unless, prior to the end of the
 120-calendar-day period, either house of the Legislature adopts by a majority vote of the duly elected and qualified members thereof a resolution indicating disapproval of the proposed emergency assistance program.

(3) As used in this section, “120 calendar days of continuous session” shall be deemed broken only by an adjournment sine die, but in computing the 120 calendar days for the purposes of this section, days on which either house is not in session because of a recess of more than 10 days shall not be included.

(c) Upon implementation of the emergency assistance program, the department shall cease implementation of those portions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450 which are superseded by the emergency assistance program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 51.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.5.

For purposes of computing and paying aid grants under this chapter, the director shall adopt regulations establishing a budgeting system consistent with Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3. Nothing in this section, or Sections 11004, 11257 and 11450, or any other provision of this code, shall be interpreted as prohibiting the
 establishment of, or otherwise restricting the operation of, any budgeting system adopted by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1022, Sec. 38.   Effective September 28, 2002.   Became operative on January 30, 2004, pursuant to Sec. 70 of Ch. 1022.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.8.

No payment of aid pursuant to Section 11450 shall be made to a family for a month in which the amount the family would receive is less than ten dollars ($10). The family shall be considered in receipt of aid for all other purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 28.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.9.

(a) (1) The department shall designate as energy assistance payments any increase in the maximum aid payments provided pursuant to Section 11450 made on or after the first day of the first session of the Legislature which is convened after the effective date of this section.

(2) Increases subject to paragraph (1) shall
 include any increase provided pursuant to Sections 11453 and 11453.05.

(b) The designation required by subdivision (a) shall be made to the extent allowed by federal law to increase CalFresh allotments to recipients of assistance under this chapter.

(c) The department shall notify the federal government of the designation made pursuant to subdivision (a) no later than 60 days after it has submitted a report on the study required by subdivision (d).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department designate the maximum amount of aid payments made under this chapter as energy assistance payments to the extent allowed under federal law to increase CalFresh allotments to recipients of assistance under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 55.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.10.

Whenever the department is informed pursuant to either Section 857 or 1764.5 that a minor is being incarcerated for a period of at least 30 consecutive days, the department shall determine whether the minor is a part of a family for whom benefits are being received pursuant to Section 11450. In any case where it is determined that a child identified pursuant to this section is a part of a family for whom aid is being received pursuant to Section 11450, the department shall notify the county welfare department in the county in which the incarcerated youth
 resides prior to the first day of the month following the receipt of the notification by the Department of the Youth Authority or by the county juvenile hall or other county juvenile facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.11.

Whenever a county welfare department is informed that a child who is incarcerated is also a member of a family receiving benefits pursuant to Section 11450, the county welfare department shall seek reimbursement of any overpayments pursuant to existing law and regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1042, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.12.

(a) (1) An applicant family shall not be eligible for aid under this chapter unless the family’s income, exclusive of the first four hundred fifty dollars ($450) of earned income for each employed person, is less than the minimum basic standard of adequate care, as specified in Section 11452.

(2) If there are subsequent changes to the income exemption as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 11451.5, the earned income exemption amount specified in this section shall be changed by an equal amount.

(b) An applicant family shall not be eligible for aid under this chapter if reasonably anticipated income, less exempt income, and exclusive of amounts of disability-based unearned
 income and earned income exempt under Section 11451.5, equals or exceeds the maximum aid payment specified in Section 11450.

(c) A recipient family shall not be eligible for further aid under this chapter if reasonably anticipated income, less exempt income, exceeds the income reporting threshold specified in Sections 11265.3 and 11265.47.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 696, Sec. 23.   (AB 172)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.13.

(a) In calculating the amount of aid to which an assistance unit is entitled in accordance with Section 11320.15, the maximum aid payment, adjusted to reflect the removal of the adult or adults from the assistance unit, shall be reduced by the gross income of the adult or adults removed from the assistance unit, determined for the semiannual period pursuant to Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, and less any amounts exempted pursuant to Section 11451.5. Aid may be provided in the form of cash or vouchers, at the option of the county.

(b) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with the act that added
 this section no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 501, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 21, Sec. 39.   (AB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.16.

(a) For purposes of determining eligibility under this chapter, and for computing the amount of aid payment under Section 11450, families shall be grouped into assistance units.

(b) Every assistance unit shall include at least one of the following persons:

(1) One of each of
 the following:

(A) An eligible child.

(B) The caretaker relative of an otherwise eligible child who is not receiving aid under Section 11250 because that child is receiving benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code), or Kin-GAP payments under Section 11364 or 11387, or foster care payments under Section 11461.

(2) A pregnant woman who is eligible for payments under subdivision (c) of Section 11450.

(c) Every assistance unit shall, in addition to the requirements of subdivision (b), include the eligible parents of the eligible child and the eligible siblings, including half-siblings, of the eligible child when those persons reside in the same home
 as the eligible child. This subdivision shall not apply to any convicted offender who is permitted to reside at the home of the eligible child as part of a court-imposed sentence and who is considered an absent parent under Section 11250.

(d) An assistance unit may, at the option of the family comprising the assistance unit, also include the nonparent caretaker relative of the eligible child, the spouse of the parent of the eligible child, otherwise eligible nonsibling children in the care of the caretaker relative of the eligible child, and the alternatively sentenced offender parent exempted under subdivision (c).

(e) If two or more assistance units reside in the same home, they shall be combined into one assistance unit when any of the following circumstances occurs:

(1) There is a common caretaker relative for
 the eligible children.

(2) One caretaker relative marries another caretaker relative.

(3) Two caretaker relatives are the parents of an eligible child.

(f) For purposes of this section, “caretaker relative” means the parent or other relative, as defined by regulations adopted by the department, who exercises responsibility and control of a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 51.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11450.17.

(a) (1) For purposes of determining the maximum aid payment specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 and for no other purpose, the number of needy persons in the same family shall not include a stepsibling or a half-sibling, as defined in subdivision (d).

(2) One hundred percent of any child support payment received for a child described in subdivision (d) shall be paid to
 the assistance unit. Any child support payment received for that child shall not be considered as income to the family for the purpose of calculating the amount of aid for which the family is eligible under this article.

(b) Each county welfare department shall notify applicants for assistance under this chapter, in writing, of the provisions of this section. The county welfare department shall also provide the notification to recipients of aid under this chapter, in writing, at the time of redetermination, or sooner.

(c) Both the department and the Department of Child Support Services shall each seek all appropriate federal waivers for the implementation of this section as necessary. If federal waivers are deemed necessary, this section shall be implemented only if federal waivers are granted.

(d) For purposes of this section, “stepsibling” or “half-sibling” means a
 child who meets all of the following conditions:

(1) He or she lives with at least one eligible child.

(2) He or she is a child for whom child support payments are received.

(3) The monthly child support payments received for the child are greater than the monthly amount of aid that the child would receive under Section 11450.

(4) The parent or caretaker relative for the assistance unit has requested in writing
 that the child not be included in the
 number of needy persons used to calculate the maximum aid payment.

(e) The designation of whether or not a child is a stepsibling or half-sibling, as defined in subdivision (d), shall only be made or reevaluated at the same time as the annual redetermination of eligibility and the processing of the semiannual report, except when it has been determined by the county that good cause exists for the designation to be made at a different time when the parent or caretaker relative voluntarily reports mid-period pursuant to Section 11265.3 or 11265.47 that the child support payment or payments have decreased or ended.

(f) This section shall become operative on November 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (SB 380)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative November 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11451.

Any county may, in its discretion, pay from its own funds additional sums for the care of any needy child, and the state and county may pay such aid as is needed for the adequate care of the family from other state or county funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11451.5.

(a) The following income shall be exempt from the calculation of the income of the family for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11450:

(1) If disability-based unearned income does not exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All disability-based unearned income, plus any amount of not otherwise exempt earned income equal to the amount of the difference between the amount of disability-based unearned income and two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(B) Fifty percent of all not otherwise exempt earned income in excess of the amount applied to meet the differential applied in subparagraph
 (A).

(2) If disability-based unearned income exceeds two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All of the first two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) in disability-based unearned income.

(B) Fifty percent of all earned income.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Earned income means gross income received as wages, salary, employer-provided sick leave benefits, commissions, or profits from activities such as a business enterprise or farming in which the recipient is engaged as a self-employed individual or as an employee.

(2) Disability-based unearned income means state disability insurance
 benefits, private disability insurance benefits, temporary workers’ compensation benefits, social security disability benefits, and any veteran’s disability compensation.

(3) Unearned income means any income not described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11451.5, as added by Section 60 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 59.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Repealed on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11451.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the following income shall be exempt from the calculation of the income of the family for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11450:

(1) If disability-based unearned income does not exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All disability-based unearned income, plus any amount of not otherwise exempt earned income equal to the amount of the difference between the amount of disability-based unearned income and two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(B) Fifty percent of all
 not otherwise exempt earned income in excess of the amount applied to meet the differential applied in subparagraph (A).

(2) If disability-based unearned income exceeds two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All of the first two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) in disability-based unearned income.

(B) Fifty percent of all earned income.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Earned income means gross income received as wages, salary, employer-provided sick leave benefits, commissions, or profits from activities such as a business enterprise or farming in which
 the recipient is engaged as a self-employed individual or as an employee.

(2) Disability-based unearned income means state disability insurance benefits, private disability insurance benefits, temporary workers’ compensation benefits, social security disability benefits, and any veteran’s disability compensation.

(3) Unearned income means any income not described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) Each two-hundred-twenty-five-dollar ($225) amount specified in subdivision (a), shall be increased as follows:

(1) Effective the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Effective one year from the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to five hundred fifty dollars ($550).

(3) Effective two years from the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to six hundred dollars ($600).

(d) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever is later.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2024, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare Systems (SAWS) can perform the necessary automation
 to implement Section 11451.5, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 60) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 588, Sec. 5.   (AB 2300)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative June 1, 2020, or after, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

11451.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the following income shall be exempt from the calculation of the income of the family for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11450:

(1) If disability-based unearned income does not exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All disability-based unearned income, plus any amount of not otherwise exempt earned income equal to the amount of the difference between the amount of disability-based unearned income and two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(B) Fifty percent of all not otherwise exempt earned income in excess of the amount applied to meet the differential applied in subparagraph (A).

(2) If disability-based unearned income exceeds two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), both of the following amounts:

(A) All of the first two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) in disability-based unearned income.

(B) Fifty percent of all earned income.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Earned income means gross income received as wages, salary, employer-provided sick leave benefits, commissions, or profits from activities such as a business
 enterprise or farming in which the recipient is engaged as a self-employed individual or as an employee.

(2) Disability-based unearned income means state disability insurance benefits, private disability insurance benefits, temporary workers’ compensation benefits, social security disability benefits, paid family leave benefits, and any veteran’s disability compensation.

(3) Unearned income means any income not described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) Each two-hundred-twenty-five-dollar ($225) amount specified in subdivision (a), shall be increased as follows:

(1) Effective the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to
 five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Effective one year from the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to five hundred fifty dollars ($550).

(3) Effective two years from the date on which this section becomes operative pursuant to subdivision (d), to six hundred dollars ($600).

(d) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2024, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare Systems (SAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever is later.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 588, Sec. 6.   (AB 2300)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally operative on or after October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11452.

(a) (1) Minimum basic standards of adequate care shall be distributed to the counties and shall be binding upon them. The standards are determined on the basis of the schedule set forth in this section, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases or decreases pursuant to Section 11453, which schedule is designed to ensure:

(A) Safe, healthful housing.

(B) Minimum clothing for health and
 decency.

(C) Low-cost adequate food budget meeting recommended dietary allowances of the National Research Council.

(D) Utilities.

(E) Other items including household operation, education and incidentals, recreation, personal needs, and insurance.

(F) Allowance for essential medical, dental, or other remedial care to the extent not otherwise provided at public expense.

(2) The schedule of minimum basic standards of adequate care is as follows:Number of eligible 
 needy persons in 
the same familyMinimum basic 
standards of 
adequate care 1 $ 341 2 560 3 694 4 824 5 940 6 1,057 7 1,160 8 1,265 9 1,37110 1,489plus fourteen dollars ($14) for each additional needy person. 

(3) (A) No adjustment shall be made under this section for the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years to reflect any change in the cost of living. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall satisfy the requirements of Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(B) Any cost-of-living adjustment under this section for the 1991–92 fiscal year and any subsequent
 fiscal year pursuant to Section 11453 shall not include any adjustment to reflect increases for the cost of living for the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years.

(C) For the 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96 fiscal years, and through October 31, 1996, a cost-of-living adjustment equivalent to 70 percent of the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11453 shall be made under this section. This adjustment, by reducing the cost-of-living adjustment that would otherwise have been made, shall satisfy the requirements of Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(b) The minimum basic standard of adequate care shall also include the amount or amounts resulting from an allowance for recurring special needs, as specified in subdivision (e) Section 11450, and the amount or amounts resulting from the granting of a nonrecurring special
 need, equal to the amounts specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450.

(c) The department shall establish rules and regulations assuring the uniform application statewide of the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 7.   Effective June 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11452.018.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the minimum basic standards of adequate care, as set forth in Section 11452, and as adjusted pursuant to any other provision of law, shall be changed for each county to reflect regional variations in housing cost based on the lowest quartile rent in each county as reported in the Decennial Census data for 1990.

(b) Counties are assigned to one of two regions and the minimum basic standards of adequate care for counties in those regions are reduced as follows:

(1) Region 1 shall include all counties with lowest quartile rents of four hundred dollars ($400) or more. There shall be no reduction in minimum basic standard of adequate care for counties in Region 1. Region 1 shall consist of the following counties:

(A) Alameda County

(B) Contra Costa County

(C) Los Angeles County

(D) Marin County

(E) Monterey County

(F) Napa County

(G) Orange County

(H) San Diego County

(I) San Francisco County

(J) San Luis Obispo County

(K) San Mateo County

(L) Santa Barbara County

(M) Santa Clara County

(N) Santa Cruz County

(O) Solano County

(P) Sonoma County

(Q) Ventura County
